Nevada, session 83, AB483.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 450B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
“Historically underserved community” means:
1. A census tract:
(a) Designated as a qualified census tract by the Secretary of
Housing and Urban Development pursuant to 26 U.S.C. §
42(d)(5)(B)(ii); or
(b) In which, in the immediately preceding census, at least 20
percent of households were not proficient in the English
language; or
2. Qualified tribal land, as defined in NRS 370.0325.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Sec. 2. NRS 450B.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.020 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 450B.025 to
450B.110, inclusive, and section 1 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. NRS 450B.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.160 1. The health authority may issue licenses to
attendants and to firefighters employed by or serving as volunteers
with a fire-fighting agency.
2. Each license must be evidenced by a card issued to the
holder of the license, is valid for a period not to exceed 2 years and
is renewable.
3. An applicant for a license must file with the health authority:
(a) A current, valid certificate evidencing the applicant’s
successful completion of a program of training as an emergency
medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician or
paramedic, if the applicant is applying for a license as an attendant,
or, if a volunteer attendant, at a level of skill determined by the
board.
(b) A current valid certificate evidencing the applicant’s
successful completion of a program of training as an emergency
medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician or
paramedic, if the applicant is applying for a license as a firefighter
with a fire-fighting agency.
(c) A signed statement showing:
(1) The name and address of the applicant;
(2) The name and address of the employer of the applicant;
and
(3) A description of the applicant’s duties.
(d) Proof that the applicant has completed the training required
by subsection 4.
(e) Such other certificates for training and such other items as
the board may specify.
4. In addition to the training required by subsection 3, each
applicant for a license must complete training concerning
identifying and interacting with persons with developmental
disabilities.
5. The board shall adopt such regulations as it determines are
necessary for the issuance, suspension, revocation and renewal of
licenses. Those regulations must include, without limitation, a
process for prioritizing the review of an application for initial
licensure if the applicant demonstrates that he or she will provide
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
emergency medical care primarily in a historically underserved
community. Such regulations:
(a) Must authorize an applicant to demonstrate that he or she
will provide emergency medical care primarily in a historically
underserved community by submitting a letter from an employer
that is located in a historically underserved community which
states:
(1) That the applicant has accepted an offer of employment
from the employer; and
(2) The date on which the applicant intends to commence
such employment; and
(b) May prescribe additional ways in which an applicant may
demonstrate that he or she will provide emergency medical care
primarily in a historically underserved community.
6. Each operator of an ambulance or air ambulance and each
fire-fighting agency shall annually file with the health authority a
complete list of the licensed persons in its service.
7. Licensed physicians, registered nurses and licensed
physician assistants may serve as attendants without being licensed
under the provisions of this section. A registered nurse who
performs emergency care in an ambulance or air ambulance shall
perform the care in accordance with the regulations of the State
Board of Nursing. A licensed physician assistant who performs
emergency care in an ambulance or air ambulance shall perform the
care in accordance with the regulations of the Board of Medical
Examiners.
8. Each licensed physician, registered nurse and licensed
physician assistant who serves as an attendant must have current
certification of completion of training in:
(a) Advanced life-support procedures for patients who require
cardiac care;
(b) Life-support procedures for pediatric patients who require
cardiac care; and
(c) Life-support procedures for patients with trauma that are
administered before the arrival of those patients at a hospital.
 The certification must be issued by the Board of Medical
Examiners for a physician or licensed physician assistant or by the
State Board of Nursing for a registered nurse.
9. The Board of Medical Examiners and the State Board of
Nursing shall issue a certificate pursuant to subsection 8 if the
licensed physician, licensed physician assistant or registered nurse
attends:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(a) A course offered by a national organization which is
nationally recognized for issuing such certification;
(b) Training conducted by the operator of an ambulance or air
ambulance; or
(c) Any other course or training,
 approved by the Board of Medical Examiners or the State Board
of Nursing, whichever is issuing the certification.
10. As used in this section, “developmental disability” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 435.007.
Sec. 4. NRS 450B.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.180 1. Any person desiring certification as an
emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical
technician or paramedic must apply to the health authority using
forms prescribed by the health authority.
2. The health authority, pursuant to regulations and procedures
adopted by the board, shall make a determination of the applicant’s
qualifications to be certified as an emergency medical technician,
advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic and shall
issue the appropriate certificate to each qualified applicant.
3. A certificate is valid for a period not exceeding 2 years and
may be renewed if the holder of the certificate complies with the
provisions of this chapter and meets the qualifications set forth in
the regulations and standards established by the board pursuant to
this chapter. The regulations and standards established by the board
must provide for the completion of:
(a) A course of instruction, within 2 years after initial
certification, relating to the medical consequences of an act of
terrorism that involves the use of a weapon of mass destruction. The
course must provide at least 4 hours of instruction that includes
instruction in the following subjects:
(1) An overview of acts of terrorism and weapons of mass
destruction;
(2) Personal protective equipment required for acts of
terrorism;
(3) Common symptoms and methods of treatment associated
with exposure to, or injuries caused by, chemical, biological,
radioactive and nuclear agents;
(4) Syndromic surveillance and reporting procedures for acts
of terrorism that involve biological agents; and
(5) An overview of the information available on, and the use
of, the Health Alert Network.
 The board may thereafter determine whether to establish
regulations and standards requiring additional courses of instruction
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
relating to the medical consequences of an act of terrorism that
involves the use of a weapon of mass destruction.
(b) Training before initial certification concerning identifying
and interacting with persons with developmental disabilities.
Training completed pursuant to this paragraph also satisfies the
requirement for such training prescribed by NRS 289.605 or
450B.160, if applicable.
4. The health authority may suspend or revoke a certificate if it
finds that the holder of the certificate no longer meets the prescribed
qualifications. Unless the certificate is suspended by the district
court pursuant to NRS 425.540, the holder of the certificate may
appeal the suspension or revocation of his or her certificate pursuant
to regulations adopted by the board.
5. The board shall determine the procedures and techniques
which may be performed by an emergency medical technician,
advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic.
6. A certificate issued pursuant to this section is valid
throughout the State, whether issued by the Division or a district
board of health.
7. The Division shall maintain a central registry of all
certificates issued pursuant to this section, whether issued by the
Division or a district board of health.
8. The board shall adopt such regulations as are necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section. Those regulations must
include, without limitation, a process for prioritizing the review of
an application for initial certification if the applicant demonstrates
that he or she will provide emergency medical care primarily in a
historically underserved community. Such regulations:
(a) Must authorize an applicant to demonstrate that he or she
will provide emergency medical care primarily in a historically
underserved community by submitting a letter from an employer
that is located in a historically underserved community which
states:
(1) That the applicant has accepted an offer of employment
from the employer; and
(2) The date on which the applicant intends to commence
such employment; and
(b) May prescribe additional ways in which an applicant may
demonstrate that he or she will provide emergency medical care
primarily in a historically underserved community.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Act of terrorism” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.4415.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(b) “Biological agent” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.442.
(c) “Chemical agent” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.4425.
(d) “Developmental disability” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 435.007.
(e) “Radioactive agent” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.4437.
(f) “Weapon of mass destruction” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 202.4445.
Sec. 5. Chapter 622 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A health care licensing board shall adopt regulations that
establish a process for prioritizing the review of an application for
initial licensure as a provider of health care under the jurisdiction
of the health care licensing board if the applicant demonstrates
that he or she will provide health care primarily in a historically
underserved community. Such regulations:
(a) Must authorize an applicant to demonstrate that he or she
will provide health care primarily in a historically underserved
community by submitting a letter from an employer that is located
in a historically underserved community which states:
(1) That the applicant has accepted an offer of employment
from the employer; and
(2) The date on which the applicant intends to commence
such employment; and
(b) May prescribe additional ways in which an applicant may
demonstrate that he or she will provide health care primarily in a
historically underserved community.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Health care licensing board” means:
(1) A board created by chapter 630, 631, 632 or 633 of
NRS.
(2) The State Board of Health with respect to chapters
634B, 640D, 640E, 652 and 653 of NRS.
(b) “Historically underserved community” means:
(1) A census tract:
(I) Designated as a qualified census tract by the
Secretary of Housing and Urban Development pursuant to 26
U.S.C. § 42(d)(5)(B)(ii); or
(II) In which, in the immediately preceding census, at
least 20 percent of households were not proficient in the English
language;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(2) A public school in this State:
(I) In which 75 percent or more of the enrolled pupils in
the school are eligible for free or reduced-price lunches pursuant
to 42 U.S.C. §§ 1751 et seq.; or
(II) That participates in universal meal service in high
poverty areas pursuant to Section 104 of the Healthy, Hunger-
Free Kids Act of 2010, Public Law 111-296; or
(3) Qualified tribal land, as defined in NRS 370.0325.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 6. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 7. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 6, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)